Illinois, session 104th, SB2753.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 13C-15 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/13C-15)7    Sec. 13C-15. Inspections.8    (a) Computer-Matched Inspections and Notification.9        (1) The provisions of this subsection (a) are 10    operative until the implementation of the registration 11    denial inspection and notification mechanisms required by 12    subsection (b). Beginning with the implementation of the 13    program required by this Chapter, every motor vehicle that 14    is owned by a resident of an affected county, other than a 15    vehicle that is exempt under paragraph (a)(6) or (a)(7), 16    is subject to inspection under the program.17        The Agency shall send notice of the assigned 18    inspection month, at least 15 days before the beginning of 19    the assigned month, to the owner of each vehicle subject 20    to the program. An initial emission inspection sticker or 21    initial inspection certificate, as the case may be, 22    expires on the last day of the third month following the 23    month assigned by the Agency for the first inspection of   SB2753- 2 -LRB104 16602 LNS 30002 b1    the vehicle. A renewal inspection sticker or certificate 2    expires on the last day of the third month following the 3    month assigned for inspection in the year in which the 4    vehicle's next inspection is required.5        The Agency or its agent may issue an interim emission 6    inspection sticker or certificate for any vehicle subject 7    to inspection that does not have a currently valid 8    emission inspection sticker or certificate at the time the 9    Agency is notified by the Secretary of State of its 10    registration by a new owner, and for which an initial 11    emission inspection sticker or certificate has already 12    been issued. An interim emission inspection sticker or 13    certificate expires no later than the last day of the 14    sixth complete calendar month after the date the Agency 15    issued the interim emission inspection sticker or 16    certificate.17        The owner of each vehicle subject to inspection shall 18    obtain an emission inspection sticker or certificate for 19    the vehicle in accordance with this paragraph (1). Before 20    the expiration of the emission inspection sticker or 21    certificate, the owner shall have the vehicle inspected 22    and, upon demonstration of compliance, obtain a renewal 23    emission inspection sticker or certificate. A renewal 24    emission inspection sticker or certificate shall not be 25    issued more than 5 months before the expiration date of 26    the previous inspection sticker or certificate.  SB2753- 3 -LRB104 16602 LNS 30002 b1        (2) Except as provided in paragraph (a)(3), vehicles 2    shall be inspected every 2 years on a schedule that begins 3    either in the second, fourth, or later calendar year after 4    the vehicle model year. The beginning test schedule shall 5    be set by the Agency and shall be consistent with the 6    State's requirements for emission reductions as determined 7    by the applicable United States Environmental Protection 8    Agency vehicle emissions estimation model and applicable 9    guidance and rules.10        (3) A vehicle may be inspected at a time outside of its 11    normal 2-year inspection schedule, if (i) the vehicle was 12    acquired by a new owner and (ii) the vehicle was required 13    to be in compliance with this Act at the time the vehicle 14    was acquired by the new owner, but it was not then in 15    compliance.16        (4) The owner of a vehicle subject to inspection shall 17    have the vehicle inspected and shall obtain and display on 18    the vehicle or carry within the vehicle, in a manner 19    specified by the Agency, a valid unexpired emission 20    inspection sticker or certificate in the manner specified 21    by the Agency. A person who violates this paragraph (4) is 22    guilty of a petty offense, except that a third or 23    subsequent violation within one year of the first 24    violation is a Class C misdemeanor. The fine imposed for a 25    violation of this paragraph (4) shall be not less than $50 26    if the violation occurred within 60 days following the   SB2753- 4 -LRB104 16602 LNS 30002 b1    date by which a new or renewal emission inspection sticker 2    or certificate was required to be obtained for the 3    vehicle, and not less than $300 if the violation occurred 4    more than 60 days after that date.5        (5) For a $20 fee, to be paid into the Vehicle 6    Inspection Fund, the Agency may inspect:7            (A) A vehicle registered in and subject to the 8        emission inspections requirements of another state.9            (B) A vehicle presented for inspection on a 10        voluntary basis.11        Any fees collected under this paragraph (5) shall not 12    offset Motor Fuel Tax Funds normally appropriated for the 13    program.14        (6) The following vehicles are not subject to 15    inspection:16            (A) Vehicles not subject to registration under 17        Article IV of Chapter 3 of this Code, other than 18        vehicles owned by the federal government.19            (B) Motorcycles, motor driven cycles, and 20        motorized pedalcycles.21            (C) Farm vehicles and implements of husbandry.22            (D) Implements of warfare owned by the State or 23        federal government.24            (E) Antique vehicles, expanded-use antique 25        vehicles, custom vehicles, street rods, and vehicles 26        of model year 1967 or before.  SB2753- 5 -LRB104 16602 LNS 30002 b1            (F) Vehicles operated exclusively for parade or 2        ceremonial purposes by any veterans, fraternal, or 3        civic organization, organized on a not-for-profit 4        basis.5            (G) Vehicles for which the Secretary of State, 6        under Section 3-117 of this Code, has issued a Junking 7        Certificate.8            (H) Diesel powered vehicles and vehicles that are 9        powered exclusively by electricity.10            (I) Vehicles operated exclusively in organized 11        amateur or professional sporting activities, as 12        defined in Section 3.310 of the Environmental 13        Protection Act.14            (J) Vehicles registered in, subject to, and in 15        compliance with the emission inspection requirements 16        of another state.17            (K) Vehicles participating in an OBD continuous 18        monitoring program operated in accordance with 19        procedures adopted by the Agency.20            (L) Vehicles of model year 1995 or earlier that do 21        not have an expired emissions test sticker or 22        certificate on February 1, 2007.23        The Agency may issue temporary or permanent exemption 24    stickers or certificates for vehicles temporarily or 25    permanently exempt from inspection under this paragraph 26    (6). An exemption sticker or certificate does not need to   SB2753- 6 -LRB104 16602 LNS 30002 b1    be displayed.2        (7) According to criteria that the Agency may adopt, a 3    motor vehicle may be exempted from the inspection 4    requirements of this Section by the Agency on the basis of 5    an Agency determination that the vehicle is located and 6    primarily used outside of the affected counties or in 7    other jurisdictions where vehicle emission inspections are 8    not required. The Agency may issue an annual exemption 9    sticker or certificate without inspection for any vehicle 10    exempted from inspection under this paragraph (7).11        (8) Any owner or lessee of a fleet of 15 or more motor 12    vehicles that are subject to inspection under this Section 13    may apply to the Agency for a permit to establish and 14    operate a private official inspection station in 15    accordance with rules adopted by the Agency.16        (9) Pursuant to Title 40, Section 51.371 of the Code 17    of Federal Regulations, the Agency may establish a program 18    of on-road testing of in-use vehicles through the use of 19    remote sensing devices. In any such program, the Agency 20    shall evaluate the emission performance of 0.5% of the 21    subject fleet or 20,000 vehicles, whichever is less. Under 22    no circumstances shall on-road testing include any sort of 23    roadblock or roadside pullover or cause any type of 24    traffic delay. If, during the course of an on-road 25    inspection, a vehicle is found to exceed the on-road 26    emissions standards established for the model year and   SB2753- 7 -LRB104 16602 LNS 30002 b1    type of vehicle, the Agency shall send a notice to the 2    vehicle owner. The notice shall document the occurrence 3    and the results of the on-road exceedance. The notice of a 4    second on-road exceedance shall indicate that the vehicle 5    has been reassigned and is subject to an out-of-cycle 6    follow-up inspection at an official inspection station. In 7    no case shall the Agency send a notice of an on-road 8    exceedance to the owner of a vehicle that was found to 9    exceed the on-road emission standards established for the 10    model year and type of vehicle, if the vehicle is 11    registered outside of the affected counties.12    (b) Registration Denial Inspection and Notification.13        (1) No later than January 1, 2008, every motor vehicle 14    that is owned by a resident of an affected county, other 15    than a vehicle that is exempt under paragraph (b)(8) or 16    (b)(9), is subject to inspection under the program.17        The owner of a vehicle subject to inspection shall 18    have the vehicle inspected and obtain proof of compliance 19    from the Agency in order to obtain or renew a vehicle 20    registration for a subject vehicle.21        The Secretary of State shall notify the owner of a 22    vehicle subject to inspection of the requirement to have 23    the vehicle tested at least 30 days prior to the beginning 24    of the month in which the vehicle's registration is due to 25    expire. Notwithstanding the preceding, vehicles with 26    permanent registration plates shall be notified at least   SB2753- 8 -LRB104 16602 LNS 30002 b1    30 days prior to the month corresponding to the date the 2    vehicle was originally registered. This notification shall 3    clearly state the vehicle's test status, based upon the 4    vehicle type, model year and registration address.5        The owner of each vehicle subject to inspection shall 6    have the vehicle inspected and, upon demonstration of 7    compliance, obtain an emissions compliance certificate for 8    the vehicle.9        (2) Except as provided in paragraphs (b)(3), (b)(4), 10    and (b)(5), vehicles shall be inspected every 2 years on a 11    schedule that begins in the sixth fourth calendar year 12    after the vehicle model year. Even model year vehicles 13    shall be inspected and comply in order to renew 14    registrations expiring in even calendar years and odd 15    model year vehicles shall be inspected and comply in order 16    to renew registrations expiring in odd calendar years.17        (3) A vehicle shall be inspected and comply at a time 18    outside of its normal 2-year inspection schedule if (i) 19    the vehicle was acquired by a new owner and (ii) the 20    vehicle had not been issued a Compliance Certificate 21    within one year of the date of application for the title or 22    registration, or both, for the vehicle.23        (4) Vehicles with 2-year registrations shall be 24    inspected every 2 years at the time of registration 25    issuance or renewal on a schedule that begins in the 26    fourth year after the vehicle model year.  SB2753- 9 -LRB104 16602 LNS 30002 b1        (5) Vehicles with permanent vehicle registration 2    plates shall be inspected every 2 years on a schedule that 3    begins in the fourth calendar year after the vehicle model 4    year in the month corresponding to the date the vehicle 5    was originally registered. Even model year vehicles shall 6    be inspected and comply in even calendar years, and odd 7    model year vehicles shall be inspected and comply in odd 8    calendar years.9        (6) The Agency and the Secretary of State shall 10    endeavor to ensure a smooth transition from test 11    scheduling from the provisions of subsection (a) to 12    subsection (b). Passing tests and waivers issued prior to 13    the implementation of this subsection (b) may be utilized 14    to establish compliance for a period of one year from the 15    date of the emissions or waiver inspection.16        (7) For a $20 fee, to be paid into the Vehicle 17    Inspection Fund, the Agency may inspect:18            (A) A vehicle registered in and subject to the 19        emissions inspections requirements of another state.20            (B) A vehicle presented for inspection on a 21        voluntary basis.22        Any fees collected under this paragraph (7) shall not 23    offset Motor Fuel Tax Funds normally appropriated for the 24    program.25        (8) The following vehicles are not subject to 26    inspection:  SB2753- 10 -LRB104 16602 LNS 30002 b1            (A) Vehicles not subject to registration under 2        Article IV of Chapter 3 of this Code, other than 3        vehicles owned by the federal government.4            (B) Motorcycles, motor driven cycles, and 5        motorized pedalcycles.6            (C) Farm vehicles and implements of husbandry.7            (D) Implements of warfare owned by the State or 8        federal government.9            (E) Antique vehicles, expanded-use antique 10        vehicles, custom vehicles, street rods, and vehicles 11        of model year 1967 or before.12            (F) Vehicles operated exclusively for parade or 13        ceremonial purposes by any veterans, fraternal, or 14        civic organization, organized on a not-for-profit 15        basis.16            (G) Vehicles for which the Secretary of State, 17        under Section 3-117 of this Code, has issued a Junking 18        Certificate.19            (H) Diesel powered vehicles and vehicles that are 20        powered exclusively by electricity.21            (I) Vehicles operated exclusively in organized 22        amateur or professional sporting activities, as 23        defined in Section 3.310 of the Environmental 24        Protection Act.25            (J) Vehicles registered in, subject to, and in 26        compliance with the emission inspection requirements   SB2753- 11 -LRB104 16602 LNS 30002 b1        of another state.2            (K) Vehicles participating in an OBD continuous 3        monitoring program operated in accordance with 4        procedures adopted by the Agency.5            (L) Vehicles of model year 1995 or earlier that do 6        not have an expired emissions test sticker or 7        certificate on February 1, 2007.8            (M) Vehicles of model year 2006 or earlier with a 9        manufacturer gross vehicle weight rating between 8,501 10        and 14,000 pounds.11            (N) Vehicles with a manufacturer gross vehicle 12        weight rating greater than 14,000 pounds. 13        The Agency may issue temporary or permanent exemption 14    certificates for vehicles temporarily or permanently 15    exempt from inspection under this paragraph (8). An 16    exemption sticker or certificate does not need to be 17    displayed.18        (9) According to criteria that the Agency may adopt, a 19    motor vehicle may be exempted from the inspection 20    requirements of this Section by the Agency on the basis of 21    an Agency determination that the vehicle is located and 22    primarily used outside of the affected counties and in 23    other jurisdictions where vehicle emissions inspections 24    are not required. The Agency may issue an annual exemption 25    certificate without inspection for any vehicle exempted 26    from inspection under this paragraph (9).  SB2753- 12 -LRB104 16602 LNS 30002 b1        (10) Any owner or lessee of a fleet of 15 or more motor 2    vehicles that are subject to inspection under this Section 3    may apply to the Agency for a permit to establish and 4    operate a private official inspection station in 5    accordance with rules adopted by the Agency.6        (11) Pursuant to Title 40, Section 51.371 of the Code 7    of Federal Regulations, the Agency may establish a program 8    of on-road testing of in-use vehicles through the use of 9    remote sensing devices. In any such program, the Agency 10    shall evaluate the emission performance of 0.5% of the 11    subject fleet or 20,000 vehicles, whichever is less. Under 12    no circumstances shall on-road testing include any sort of 13    roadblock or roadside pullover or cause any type of 14    traffic delay. If, during the course of an on-road 15    inspection, a vehicle is found to exceed the on-road 16    emissions standards established for the model year and 17    type of vehicle, the Agency shall send a notice to the 18    vehicle owner. The notice shall document the occurrence 19    and the results of the on-road exceedance. The notice of a 20    second on-road exceedance shall indicate that the vehicle 21    has been reassigned and is subject to an out-of-cycle 22    follow-up inspection at an official inspection station. In 23    no case shall the Agency send a notice of an on-road 24    exceedance to the owner of a vehicle that was found to 25    exceed the on-road emissions standards established for the 26    model year and type of vehicle, if the vehicle is   SB2753- 13 -LRB104 16602 LNS 30002 b1    registered outside of the affected counties.2(Source: P.A. 97-106, eff. 2-1-12; 97-412, eff. 1-1-12; 397-813, eff. 7-13-12.)